Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202527-413
Offense of sexual assault, defined.

For purposes of sections 27-414 and 27-415, offense of sexual assault means sexual assault under section 28-319 or 28-320, sexual abuse by a school worker under section 28-316.01, sexual assault of a child under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01, sexual assault by use of an electronic communication device under section 28-320.02, sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee under sections 28-322.01 to 28-322.03, sexual abuse of a protected individual under section 28-322.04, sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05, an attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the crimes listed in this section, or the commission of or conviction for a crime in another jurisdiction that is substantially similar to any crime listed in this section.

Laws 2009, LB97, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB519, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB881, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 24.